tests/пуртӑ.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах пуртӑ":
    пуртӑ<n><nom> :  пуртӑ 
    пуртӑ<n><gen> :  пурттӑн 
    пуртӑ<n><dat> :  пуртта 
    пуртӑ<n><loc> :  пуртӑра 
    пуртӑ<n><abl> :  пуртӑран 
    пуртӑ<n><ins> :  пуртӑпа 
    пуртӑ<n><abe> :  пуртӑсӑр 
    пуртӑ<n><ben> :  пуртӑшӑн
    пуртӑ<n><px1sg><nom> :  пурттӑм 
    пуртӑ<n><px1sg><gen> :  пурттӑмӑн 
    пуртӑ<n><px1sg><dat> :  пурттӑма 
    пуртӑ<n><px1sg><loc> :  пурттӑмра 
    пуртӑ<n><px1sg><abl> :  пурттӑмран 
    пуртӑ<n><px1sg><ins> :  пурттӑмпа 
    пуртӑ<n><px1sg><abe> :  пурттӑмсӑр 
    пуртӑ<n><px1sg><ben> :  пурттӑмшӑн
    пуртӑ<n><px2sg><nom> :  пуртту 
    пуртӑ<n><px2sg><gen> :  пурттун 
    пуртӑ<n><px2sg><dat> :  пурттуна 
    пуртӑ<n><px2sg><loc> :  пурттунта 
    пуртӑ<n><px2sg><abl> :  пурттунтан 
    пуртӑ<n><px2sg><ins> :  пурттупа 
    пуртӑ<n><px2sg><abe> :  пурттусӑр 
    пуртӑ<n><px2sg><ben> :  пурттушӑн
    пуртӑ<n><px3sp><nom> :  пуртти 
    пуртӑ<n><px3sp><gen> :  пурттин
    пуртӑ<n><px3sp><dat> :  пурттине 
    пуртӑ<n><px3sp><loc> :  пурттинче 
    пуртӑ<n><px3sp><abl> :  пурттинчен 
    пуртӑ<n><px3sp><ins> :  пурттипе 
    пуртӑ<n><px3sp><abe> :  пурттисӗр 
    пуртӑ<n><px3sp><ben> :  пурттишӗн
    пуртӑ<n><px1pl><nom> :  пурттӑмӑр 
    пуртӑ<n><px1pl><gen> :  пурттӑмӑрӑн 
    пуртӑ<n><px1pl><dat> :  пурттӑмӑра 
    пуртӑ<n><px1pl><loc> :  пурттӑмӑрта 
    пуртӑ<n><px1pl><abl> :  пурттӑмӑртан 
    пуртӑ<n><px1pl><ins> :  пурттӑмӑрпа 
    пуртӑ<n><px1pl><abe> :  пурттӑмӑрсӑр 
    пуртӑ<n><px1pl><ben> :  пурттӑмӑршӑн
    пуртӑ<n><px2pl><nom> :  пурттӑр 
    пуртӑ<n><px2pl><gen> :  пурттӑрӑн 
    пуртӑ<n><px2pl><dat> :  пурттӑра 
    пуртӑ<n><px2pl><loc> :  пурттӑрта 
    пуртӑ<n><px2pl><abl> :  пурттӑртан 
    пуртӑ<n><px2pl><ins> :  пурттӑрпа 
    пуртӑ<n><px2pl><abe> :  пурттӑрсӑр 
    пуртӑ<n><px2pl><ben> :  пурттӑршӑн
    пуртӑ<n><pl><nom> :  пуртӑсем 
    пуртӑ<n><pl><gen> :  пуртӑсен 
    пуртӑ<n><pl><dat> :  пуртӑсене 
    пуртӑ<n><pl><loc> :  пуртӑсенче 
    пуртӑ<n><pl><abl> :  пуртӑсенчен 
    пуртӑ<n><pl><ins> :  пуртӑсемпе 
    пуртӑ<n><pl><abe> :  пуртӑсемсӗр 
    пуртӑ<n><pl><ben> :  пуртӑсемшӗн
    пуртӑ<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  пурттӑмсем 
    пуртӑ<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  пурттӑмсен 
    пуртӑ<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  пурттӑмсене 
    пуртӑ<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  пурттӑмсенче 
    пуртӑ<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  пурттӑмсенчен 
    пуртӑ<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  пурттӑмсемпе 
    пуртӑ<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  пурттӑмсемсӗр 
    пуртӑ<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  пурттӑмсемшӗн
    пуртӑ<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  пурттусем 
    пуртӑ<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  пурттусен 
    пуртӑ<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  пурттусене 
    пуртӑ<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  пурттусенче 
    пуртӑ<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  пурттусенчен 
    пуртӑ<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  пурттусемпе 
    пуртӑ<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  пурттусемсӗр 
    пуртӑ<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  пурттусемшӗн
    пуртӑ<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  пурттисем 
    пуртӑ<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  пурттисен 
    пуртӑ<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  пурттисене 
    пуртӑ<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  пурттисенче 
    пуртӑ<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  пурттисенчен 
    пуртӑ<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  пурттисемпе 
    пуртӑ<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  пурттисемсӗр 
    пуртӑ<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  пурттисемшӗн
    пуртӑ<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  пурттӑмӑрсем 
    пуртӑ<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  пурттӑмӑрсен 
    пуртӑ<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  пурттӑмӑрсене 
    пуртӑ<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  пурттӑмӑрсенче 
    пуртӑ<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  пурттӑмӑрсенчен 
    пуртӑ<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  пурттӑмӑрсемпе 
    пуртӑ<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  пурттӑмӑрсемсӗр 
    пуртӑ<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  пурттӑмӑрсемшӗн
    пуртӑ<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  пурттӑрсем 
    пуртӑ<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  пурттӑрсен 
    пуртӑ<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  пурттӑрсене 
    пуртӑ<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  пурттӑрсенче 
    пуртӑ<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  пурттӑрсенчен 
    пуртӑ<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  пурттӑрсемпе 
    пуртӑ<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  пурттӑрсемсӗр 
    пуртӑ<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  пурттӑрсемшӗн
